Maryland, session 2026, HB0607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
4–103.
The Comptroller’s annual salary shall be:
(1) [$165,000] $175,000 for the first year of the term beginning January
[2023] 2027;
(2) [$170,000] $180,000 starting on the first anniversary of the beginning
of the term;
(3) [$173,000] $180,000 starting on the second anniversary of the
beginning of the term; and
(4) [$175,000] $185,000 starting on the third anniversary of the beginning
of the term and thereafter.
5–104.
(a) The Treasurer shall devote full time to the duties of office.
(b) The Treasurer shall address the Legislative Policy Committee of the General
Assembly on a semiannual basis and as necessary on issues of legislative importance,
– 1 –

Ch. 561 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
including the activities of the Board of Public Works, bond sales, and investment and
procurement initiatives.
(c) The Treasurer’s annual salary shall be:
(1) [$165,000] $175,000 for the first year of appointment beginning
January[, 2023] 2027;
(2) [$170,000] $180,000 starting on the first anniversary after
appointment;
(3) [$173,000] $180,000 starting on the second anniversary after
appointment; and
(4) [$175,000] $185,000 starting on the third anniversary after
appointment and thereafter.
6–103.
(a) There is an Attorney General of the State, as provided in Article V, § 1 of the
Maryland Constitution.
(b) The Attorney General’s annual salary shall be:
(1) [$165,000] $175,000 for the first year of the term beginning January[,
2023] 2027;
(2) [$170,000] $180,000 starting on the first anniversary of the beginning
of the term;
(3) [$173,000] $180,000 starting on the second anniversary of the
beginning of the term; and
(4) [$175,000] $185,000 starting on the third anniversary of the beginning
of the term and thereafter.
(c) The Attorney General is also entitled to reimbursement for travel and other
expenses that are connected with the duties of the Office.
7–107.
The Secretary of State’s annual salary shall be:
(1) [$112,500] $120,000 for the first year of appointment beginning
January[, 2023] 2027;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 561
(2) [$116,000] $124,000 starting on the first anniversary after
appointment;
(3) [$118,500] $124,000 starting on the second anniversary after
appointment; and
(4) [$120,000] $128,000 starting on the third anniversary after
appointment and thereafter.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the Comptroller, Treasurer, Attorney General, or Secretary
of State while serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but
the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the Comptroller,
Treasurer, Attorney General, or Secretary of State shall take effect at the beginning of the
next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an individual appointed or
elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 3 –